Massachusetts, session 194th, S2505.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Except as expressly provided below, chapter 788 of the acts of 1963 is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 2. As of the effective date of this act, the town of Westminster shall assume
the rights, duties and responsibilities formerly held by the Holmes Park Water District to supply
water to inhabitants within the boundaries of said former District for all purposes set forth in
chapter 788 of the acts of 1963. All infrastructure, equipment, facilities, funds, assets, liabilities
and property of the District shall be assumed by the town of Westminster, and said infrastructure
shall become part of the town's water supply system under the care, custody and control of the
town's public works commission.
SECTION 3. As of the effective date of this act, any rates, taxes or other charges due and
owing to said District by any inhabitants of said District shall become due and payable to the
of 2

town of Westminster. The town, by and through its public works commission, shall have all legal
rights of enforcement and collection of such rates, taxes and charges.
SECTION 4. Any funds held by the District as of the effective date of this act shall be
transferred to the custody and control of the town of Westminster. Such funds shall be used first
to pay any and all debts of the District. Any excess funds shall be credited to the town's water
enterprise fund established under section 53F1/2 of chapter 44 and shall be used for purposes of
said enterprise.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2